Hawaii statutes.
§286-226 Routes. The intrastate
shipment of explosives of any quantity that would require placarding of the
transporting motor vehicle by the rules adopted pursuant to this part, shall
not take place without first giving the police department and the fire
department of the county in which the explosives are to be transported a
forty-eight hour minimum advance notice. This advance notice shall be in
writing and indicate the quantity and type of explosive material being shipped,
the date and time of the shipment, and the route over which the explosive
shipment will travel. This provision does not apply to the military during the
period of an emergency or disaster proclaimed by the President, the governor,
or a county mayor. [L 1989, c 185, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 111, §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next